incubator/apertium-rmy/apertium-rmy.rmy.dix
    <pardef n="/ekh__det">
      <e><p><l>ekh</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'kh</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eg</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekh</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>'kh</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eg</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekhe</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ekha</l><r>ekh<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->
  
    <pardef n="S__sap">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ale</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sap__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/></r></p><par n="S__sap"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kher__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/></r></p><par n="S__sap"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kavadj/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="djel/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kot/o__n">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>urja</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jakh__n" c="FIXME: p.59">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ale</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kat__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jan</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e><p><l>jale</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rakl/o__n">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>eja</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ale</l><r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rakl/i__n">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__rakles"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ijo</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jan</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jan</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="S__raklen"/></e>
      <e><p><l>jale</l><r>i<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="S__bar/o">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ja</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="murr/o__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="S__bar/o"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="bar/o__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>o<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="S__bar/o"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="či__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maj__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <e lm="ekh"><i/><par n="/ekh__det"/></e>
    <e lm="raklo"><i>rakl</i><par n="rakl/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rakli"><i>rakl</i><par n="rakl/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sap"><i>sap</i><par n="sap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koto"><i>kot</i><par n="kot/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kher" c="X"><i>kher</i><par n="kher__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kat"><i>kat</i><par n="kat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jakh"><i>jakh</i><par n="jakh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="djela"><i>djel</i><par n="jakh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="murro"><i>murr</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tjiro"><i>tjir</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lesko"><i>lesk</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lako"><i>lak</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amaro"><i>amar</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tumaro"><i>tumar</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lengo"><i>leng</i><par n="murr/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baro"><i>bar</i><par n="bar/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="purrano"><i>purran</i><par n="bar/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maj"><i>maj</i><par n="maj__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="či"><i>či</i><par n="či__adv"/></e>
